Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1516
Miscellaneous Record.

The register of deeds, if using the book form of recording, shall keep a separate book to be called the Miscellaneous Record in which all instruments and writings not entitled to be recorded in any of the books herein provided for shall be recorded.

Laws 1885, c. 41, § 10, p. 224;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 12, p. 367;

R.S.1913, § 5631;

C.S.1922, § 4958;

C.S.1929, § 26-1216;

R.S.1943, § 23-1516;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 10.